spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.aff
SFX C   0    cskenél      [iouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX C   0    cskenek      [iouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX C   0    csken        [iouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX C   0    cskeig       [iouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX C   0    cskehez      [iouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX C   0    cskeből      [iouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX C   0    cskeben      [iouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX C   0    cskebe       [iouáéíóőöúűü]
SFX C   0    cske         [iouáéíóőöúűü]
